Illinois, session 104th, HB919.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Power Agency Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3855/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Illinois Power Agency Act. References in this Article to "this 9Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 95-481, eff. 8-28-07.)